Washington statutes.
RCW 32.20.217

Obligations of Asian Development Bank.

A mutual savings bank may invest not to exceed five percent of its funds in obligations issued or guaranteed by the Asian Development Bank.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 222 s 7.]

NOTES:

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 222: See note following RCW 32.04.085.